Maryland, session 2025, HB1530.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–1A–01.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1530*

HOUSE BILL 1530
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Eligible prekindergarten provider” includes an:
(1) Eligible public provider; and
(2) Eligible private provider.
(e) (1) “Eligible private provider” means a community–based early learning
program that:
(i) Is licensed in the State;
(ii) Does not charge more tuition for full–day prekindergarten than
the cost of quality; and
(iii) Meets the requirements under § 7–1A–04 of this subtitle.
(2) “Eligible private provider” includes the Ulysses Currie Head Start
Program under § 5–231 of this article.
(f) “Eligible public provider” means an early learning program that:
(1) Is provided by a county board at a public school; and
(2) Meets the requirements under § 7–1A–04 of this subtitle.
7–1A–09.
(a) (1) The Department shall establish prekindergarten provider hubs in
centralized and diverse locations throughout the State.
(2) Prekindergarten provider hubs shall be designed to help bring as many
providers into the State’s mixed prekindergarten delivery system as possible.
(3) Prekindergarten provider hubs shall form partnerships between:
(i) Early childhood educators on the early childhood educator career
ladder;
(ii) Child care centers licensed under Title 9.5, Subtitle 4 of this
article;
(iii) Family child care homes or large family child care homes
registered under Title 9.5, Subtitle 3 of this article; and

HOUSE BILL 1530 3
(iv) Any other entities that the Department determines will aid in
bringing eligible children into the State’s mixed delivery system.
(4) Prekindergarten provider hubs shall coordinate support among entities
that serve children and their families to ensure that the maximum number of eligible
children are able to be placed in a prekindergarten slot.
(b) (1) The Department shall establish a program to aid eligible
prekindergarten providers in meeting the requirements of this subtitle.
(2) The program shall provide to eligible private providers:
(i) Information on professional development opportunities for
teachers and teaching assistants;
(ii) Technical support for meeting requirements to enroll in child
care support programs; and
(iii) Assistance with implementing early childhood curriculum
standards.
(3) To the extent practicable, the Department shall provide programmatic
support in accordance with this subsection through prekindergarten provider hubs.
(c) (1) The Department shall publish a list of eligible private providers in each
local school system on its website and distribute the list to the following entities and
organizations located within the areas in which the eligible private providers are located:
(i) A local office of economic development;
(ii) The Maryland Small Business Development Center;
(iii) A local management board;
(iv) A local workforce development board; and
(v) A local office supporting minority and women–owned businesses.
(2) An entity or organization listed under paragraph (1) of this subsection
shall, if applicable, assist a private prekindergarten provider in its jurisdiction with:
(i) Enrolling in business support services for which the provider
qualifies; and
(ii) Adopting a business plan to help the provider meet the
requirements of this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 1530
(3) To the extent practicable, organizations listed under paragraph (1) of
this subsection shall work with prekindergarten provider hubs to provide support.
(d) The Department shall publicize the availability of publicly funded
prekindergarten programs to the public.
(E) (1) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTIONS (C) AND
(D) OF THIS SECTION AND SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) THROUGH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAINTAIN ON
THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE A PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE DATA DASHBOARD THAT
PROVIDES INFORMATION ON ELIGIBLE PREKINDERGARTEN PROVIDERS.
(2) THE DATA DASHBOARD SHALL BE UPDATED MONTHLY AND
INCLUDE INFORMATION ON ELIGIBLE PREKINDERGARTEN PROVIDERS THAT IS
SEARCHABLE USING FILTERS FOR:
(I) ZIP CODES, WITH AN OPTION TO SEARCH A DISTANCE
RADIUS WITHIN EACH ZIP CODE;
(II) AGE OF THE CHILD TO BE SERVED;
(III) THE TYPE OF CARE, SUCH AS WHETHER THE PROVIDER IS
HOME– OR CENTER–BASED;
(IV) OPERATING HOURS, SUCH AS OPENING AND CLOSING TIMES
AND DAYS OF THE WEEK;
(V) THE MAXIMUM WEEKLY PRICE FOR FULL–TIME CARE;
(VI) THE MARYLAND EXCELS PROGRAM QUALITY LEVEL
RATING;
(VII) FINANCIAL AID AVAILABILITY;
(VIII) PROGRAM DURATION, SUCH AS WHETHER THE PROGRAM IS
OFFERED ON A SCHOOL–YEAR OR YEAR–ROUND BASIS;
(IX) PREFERRED LANGUAGE;
(X) SPECIAL NEEDS SERVICES; AND
(XI) AVAILABILITY OF THE PROVIDER.

HOUSE BILL 1530 5
(3) TO ESTABLISH THE DATA DASHBOARD UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) PARTNER WITH A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION IN THE STATE
THAT HAS EXPERIENCE MAINTAINING AN EXISTING DATA DASHBOARD FOR CHILD
CARE PROVIDERS THAT CONTAINS SIMILAR INFORMATION AS DESCRIBED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, INTEGRATE THE DATA
DASHBOARD OF THE DEPARTMENT WITH THE EXISTING DATA DASHBOARD OF THE
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS THAT ALLOWS
AN ELIGIBLE PREKINDERGARTEN PROVIDER TO OPT OUT OF BEING INCLUDED IN
THE DATA DASHBOARD ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.